tsts-nov19/apertium-tg-fa.tg.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЧШЪЭЮЯҒӢҚӮҲҶабвгдеёжзийклмнопрстуфхчшъэюяғӣқӯҳҷ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine-Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Lexical verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>

    <sdef n="aff"     c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="int"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c="Impersonal"/>
 
    <sdef n="tn"      c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="pve"     c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="attr"    c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="pred"    c="Predicative"/>

    <sdef n="detnt"   c="Neuter determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet"  c="Pre determiner"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj"    c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="pro"     c="Proclitic"/>
    <sdef n="acr"     c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="al"      c="Other / Otros"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"      c="Noun noun"/>
    <sdef n="an"      c="Adjective noun"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Adjective adjective"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"     c="Pretério perfecto o indefinido"/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Pretério imperfecto de indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="cni"     c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="prs"     c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis"     c="Pretério imperfecto de subjunctivo"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="imprt"   c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative"/>

    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>


    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"  c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>    
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"    c="The verb 'to do'"/>
    <sdef n="unc"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>

    <sdef n="pref"    c="Prefix"/>

    <sdef n="izo"     c="izofa"/>
    <sdef n="me"      c="me verb prefix"/>
    <sdef n="bi"      c="bi verb prefix"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Enclitics -->
    <pardef n="S__ind">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><j/>е<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r/>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__iza">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
	  <r><j/>izafet<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>-и</l>
	  <r><j/>izafet<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r/>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="S__izaORind"> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        <par n="S__ind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <l/>
        <r/>
        <par n="S__iza"/>
      </e>
      
      
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="P__subj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>би</l>
	  <r>prefix<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><j/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r/>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="directobject__enc">
      <e>
	<p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="enc"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pronominal__enc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аш</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>амон</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>атон</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ашон</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numbers -->
    <pardef n="як__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ду__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <e lm="ро"><i>ро</i><par n="directobject__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="ро"><i>-ро</i><par n="directobject__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="pronominal enclitic"><i/><par n="pronominal__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="як"><i>як</i><par n="як__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ду"><i>ду</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="се"><i>се</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чиҳор"><i>чиҳор</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="панҷ"><i>панҷ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шаш"><i>шаш</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳафт"><i>ҳафт</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳашт"><i>ҳашт</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="нуҳ"><i>нуҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="даҳ"><i>даҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ёздаҳ"><i>ёздаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="давоздаҳ"><i>давоздаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="сиздаҳ"><i>сиздаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чаҳордаҳ"><i>чаҳордаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="понздаҳ"><i>понздаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шонздаҳ"><i>шонздаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳефдаҳ"><i>ҳефдаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳеҷдаҳ"><i>ҳеҷдаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="нӯздаҳ"><i>нӯздаҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="бист"><i>бист</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="си"><i>си</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="чеҳел"><i>чеҳел</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="панҷоҳ"><i>панҷоҳ</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шаст"><i>шаст</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳафтод"><i>ҳафтод</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳаштод"><i>ҳаштод</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="навад"><i>навад</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="сад"><i>сад</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дусад"><i>дусад</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
    </e>
